Utah statutes.
70A-9a-607.   Collection and enforcement by secured party.
(1)  If so agreed, and in any event after default, a secured party:
(a)  may notify an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to
make payment or otherwise render performance to or for the benefit of the
secured party;
(b)  may take any proceeds to which the secured party is entitled under
Section 70A-9a-315;
(c)  may enforce the obligations of an account debtor or other person
obligated on collateral and exercise the rights of the debtor with respect to
the obligation of the account debtor or other person obligated on collateral
to make payment or otherwise render performance to the debtor, and with
respect to any property that secures the obligations of the account debtor or
other person obligated on the collateral;
(d)  if it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control
under Subsection 70A-9a-104(1)(a), may apply the balance of the deposit
account to the obligation secured by the deposit account; and
(e)  if it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control
under Subsection 70A-9a-104(1)(b) or (c), may instruct the bank to pay the
balance of the deposit account to or for the benefit of the secured party.
(2)  If necessary to enable a secured party to exercise under Subsection
(1)(c) the right of a debtor to enforce a mortgage nonjudicially, the secured
party may record in the office in which a record of the mortgage is recorded:
(a)  a copy of the security agreement that creates or provides for a security
interest in the obligation secured by the mortgage; and
(b)  the secured party's sworn affidavit in recordable form stating that:
(i)  a default has occurred; and
(ii)  the secured party is entitled to enforce the mortgage nonjudicially.
(3)  A secured party shall proceed in a commercially reasonable manner if the
secured party:
(a)  undertakes to collect from or enforce an obligation of an account debtor
or other person obligated on collateral; and
(b)  is entitled to charge back uncollected collateral or otherwise to full or
limited recourse against the debtor or a secondary obligor.
(4)  A secured party may deduct from the collections made pursuant to
Subsection (3) reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement, including
reasonable attorney's fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party.
(5)  This section does not determine whether an account debtor, bank, or other
person obligated on collateral owes a duty to a secured party.
